New York, session 2025-2026, S1462.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1974-b of the public authorities law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. (a) For purposes of this subdivision: (i) "eligible homeowner" 4 shall mean an owner of a residence located in the Battery Park project 5 area who occupies such residence as the homeowner's primary residence 6 and whose annual household income does not exceed one hundred fifty 7 percent of the area median income defined and calculated by the United 8 States department of housing and urban development for the New York city 9 region, adjusted for household size; (ii) "eligible renter" shall mean a 10 person whose primary residence is located in the Battery Park project 11 area and is designated a quasi-rent stabilized unit or has restrictions 12 on annual rent increases pursuant to a regulatory agreement between the 13 authority and the landlord, and whose annual household income does not 14 exceed one hundred fifty percent of the area median income defined and 15 calculated by the United States department of housing and urban develop- 16 ment for the New York city region; (iii) "rebate base year" shall mean 17 the year two thousand twenty-five for any homeowner who is an eligible EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04155-03-6 S. 1462--A 2 1 homeowner or any renter who is an eligible renter based upon their annu- 2 al household income for the year two thousand twenty-six, or the year 3 preceding the year in which a homeowner first becomes an eligible home- 4 owner or a renter first becomes an eligible renter; in the event a 5 previously eligible homeowner or a previously eligible renter becomes 6 ineligible because the homeowner's or renter's household income exceeds 7 one hundred fifty percent of the area median income for two consecutive 8 years, the rebate base year shall be reset to be the year preceding any 9 subsequent year in which the homeowner or renter again becomes eligible; 10 (iv) "homeowner's ground rent" shall mean the portion of a homeowner's 11 building's ground rent attributable to the homeowner's occupancy of the 12 homeowner's primary residence and paid by the homeowner to the authority 13 under the building's residential sublease to the lease between the city 14 of New York and the authority, dated November twenty-four, nineteen 15 hundred sixty-nine and recorded December twenty-six, nineteen hundred 16 sixty-nine on page one of reel one hundred sixty-one, and any subsequent 17 amendments; and (v) "renter's ground rent" shall mean the portion of a 18 renter's rent payment attributable to the ground rent based on the 19 renter's occupancy of their primary residence and paid by the landlord 20 to the authority under the building's residential sublease to the lease 21 between the city of New York and the authority, dated November twenty- 22 four, nineteen hundred sixty-nine and recorded December twenty-six, 23 nineteen hundred sixty-nine on page one of reel one hundred sixty-one, 24 and any subsequent amendments. 25 (b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the authori- 26 ty shall offer to each eligible homeowner and eligible renter a rebate 27 of the portion of such homeowner's or renter's ground rent equal to the 28 difference between the amount of such homeowner's or renter's ground 29 rent due in the rebate base year and the amount of the homeowner's or 30 renter's ground rent due and paid in the year for which the eligible 31 homeowner or eligible renter applies for the rebate. If the authority 32 determines a homeowner to be an eligible homeowner or a renter to be an 33 eligible renter for a given year, the authority shall permit such eligi- 34 ble homeowner or eligible renter to certify that they expect to meet the 35 eligibility criteria in the next succeeding year; upon reviewing such 36 certification and finding that such homeowner or renter is likely to be 37 an eligible homeowner or eligible renter in such next succeeding year, 38 the authority shall, to the extent practicable, offer a proportional 39 share of the expected annual rebate in the form of a periodic rebate or 40 discount during the year for which the homeowner or renter is expected 41 to be eligible. 42 (c) Within one hundred eighty days of the effective date of this 43 subdivision, the authority shall promulgate procedures for applying for 44 such rebate, and set standards for reviewing applications and certif- 45 ications, assessing the accuracy of any information necessary to deter- 46 mine eligibility, and making payments to applicants found to be eligible 47 and those expected to be eligible in the next succeeding year. 48 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.